Hawaii statutes.
§189-22 Hawaii large fishing vessel
purchase, construction, renovation, maintenance, and repair loan program.
There is hereby created the Hawaii large fishing vessel purchase, construction,
renovation, maintenance, and repair loan program which shall be administered by
the director in accordance with the spirit and intent of this part. [L 1965, c
193, §3; Supp, §21-102; HRS §189-22; am L 1975, c 167, pt of §4; am L 1976, c
70, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next